Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 30. Tax Increment Financing

154.30-010.
Definitions for subchapter.

As used in this subchapter:

“Activation date” means:

For all projects except those described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the date established any time within a two (2) year period after the commencement date. The Commonwealth may extend the two (2) year period to no more than four (4) years upon written application by the agency requesting the extension; and

For signature projects approved under KRS 154.30-050(2)(a), the date established any time within a ten (10) year period after the commencement date.

“Agency” means:

An urban renewal and community development agency established under KRS Chapter 99;

A development authority established under KRS Chapter 99;

A nonprofit corporation;

A housing authority established under KRS Chapter 80;

An air board established under KRS 183.132 to 183.160;

A local industrial development authority established under KRS 154.50-301 to 154.50-346;

A riverport authority established under KRS 65.510 to 65.650; or

A designated department, division, or office of a city or county;

“Approved public infrastructure costs” means costs associated with the acquisition, installation, construction, or reconstruction of public works, public improvements, and public buildings, including planning and design costs associated with the development of such public amenities. “Approved public infrastructure costs” includes but is not limited to costs incurred for the following:

Land preparation, including demolition and clearance work;

Buildings;

Sewers and storm drainage;

Curbs, sidewalks, promenades, and pedways;

Roads;

Street lighting;

The provision of utilities;

Environmental remediation;

Floodwalls and floodgates;

Public spaces or parks;

Parking;

Easements and rights-of-way;

Transportation facilities;

Public landings;

Amenities, such as fountains, benches, and sculptures; and

Riverbank modifications and improvements;

“Approved signature project costs” means:

The acquisition of land for portions of the project that are for infrastructure; and

Costs associated with the acquisition, installation, development, construction, improvement, or reconstruction of infrastructure, including planning and design costs associated with the development of infrastructure, including but not limited to parking structures, including portions of parking structures that serve as platforms to support development above;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority established by KRS 154.20-010;

“Capital investment” means:

Obligations incurred for labor and to contractors, subcontractors, builders, and material men in connection with the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of a project;

The cost of acquiring land or rights in land within the development area on the footprint of the project, and any cost incident thereto, including recording fees;

The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary during the course of acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of a project which is not paid by the contractor or contractors or otherwise provided;

All costs of architectural and engineering services, including test borings, surveys, estimates, plans, specifications, preliminary investigations, supervision of construction, and the performance of all the duties required by or consequent upon the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of a project;

All costs that are required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the acquisition, construction, installation, equipping, and rehabilitation of a project; and

All other costs of a nature comparable to those described in this subsection that occur after preliminary approval;

“City” means any city, consolidated local government, or urban-county government;

“Commencement date” means the final approval date or the date on which a tax incentive agreement is executed;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“County” means any county, consolidated local government, charter county, unified local government, or urban-county government;

“CPI” means the nonseasonally adjusted Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, all items, base year computed for 1982 to 1984 equals one hundred (100), published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics;

“Department” means the Department of Revenue;

“Development area” means an area established under KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and 65.7053;

“Economic development projects” means projects which are approved for tax credits under Subchapter 20, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 34, or 48 of KRS Chapter 154;

“Financing costs” means principal, interest, costs of issuance, debt service reserve requirements, underwriting discount, costs of credit enhancement or liquidity instruments, and other costs directly related to the issuance of bonds or debt for approved public infrastructure costs or approved signature project costs for projects approved pursuant to KRS 154.30-050;

“Footprint” means the actual perimeter of a discrete, identified project within a development area. The footprint shall not include any portion of a development area outside the area for which actual capital investments are made and must be contiguous;

“Governing body” means the body possessing legislative authority in a city or county;

“Increment bonds” means bonds and notes issued for the purpose of paying the costs of one (1) or more projects;

“Incremental revenues” means:

The amount of revenues received by a taxing district, as determined by subtracting old revenues from new revenues in a calendar year with respect to a development area, or a project within a development area; or

The amount of revenues received by the Commonwealth as determined by subtracting old revenues from new revenues in a calendar year with respect to the footprint;

“Local participation agreement” means the agreement entered into under KRS 65.7063;

“Local tax revenues” has the same meaning as in KRS 65.7045;

“New revenues” means:

The amount of local tax revenues received by a taxing district with respect to a development area in any calendar year beginning with the year in which the activation date occurred;

The amount of state tax revenues received by the Commonwealth with respect to the footprint in any calendar year beginning with the year in which the activation date occurred;

“Old revenues” means:

The amount of local tax revenues received by a taxing district with respect to a development area as of December 31 of the year of preliminary approval; or

The amount of state tax revenues received by the Commonwealth within the footprint as of December 31 of the year of preliminary approval. If the authority determines that the amount of state tax revenues received as of December 31 of the last calendar year prior to the commencement of preliminary approval does not represent a true and accurate depiction of revenues, the authority may consider revenues for a period of no longer than three (3) calendar years prior to the year of preliminary approval, so as to determine a fair representation of state tax revenues. The amount determined by the authority shall be specified in the tax incentive agreement. If state tax revenues were derived from the footprint prior to the year of preliminary approval, old revenues shall increase each calendar year by:
(b) 1.

The amount of state tax revenues received by the Commonwealth within the footprint as of December 31 of the year of preliminary approval. If the authority determines that the amount of state tax revenues received as of December 31 of the last calendar year prior to the commencement of preliminary approval does not represent a true and accurate depiction of revenues, the authority may consider revenues for a period of no longer than three (3) calendar years prior to the year of preliminary approval, so as to determine a fair representation of state tax revenues. The amount determined by the authority shall be specified in the tax incentive agreement. If state tax revenues were derived from the footprint prior to the year of preliminary approval, old revenues shall increase each calendar year by:

The percentage increase, if any, of the CPI or a comparable index; or

An alternative percentage increase that is determined to be appropriate by the authority.

If state revenues were derived from the footprint prior to the year of preliminary approval, the calculation of incremental revenues shall be based on the value of old revenues as increased using the method prescribed in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph to reflect the same calendar year as is used in the determination of new revenues;

“Outstanding” means increment bonds that have been issued, delivered, and paid for by the purchaser, except any of the following:

Increment bonds canceled upon surrender, exchange, or transfer, or upon payment or redemption;

Increment bonds in replacement of which or in exchange for which other increment bonds have been issued; or

Increment bonds for the payment, redemption, or purchase for cancellation prior to maturity, of which sufficient moneys or investments, in accordance with the ordinance or other proceedings or any applicable law, by mandatory sinking fund redemption requirements, or otherwise, have been deposited, and credited in a sinking fund or with a trustee or paying or escrow agent, whether at or prior to their maturity or redemption, and, in the case of increment bonds to be redeemed prior to their stated maturity, notice of redemption has been given or satisfactory arrangements have been made for giving notice of that redemption, or waiver of that notice by or on behalf of the affected bond holders has been filed with the issuer or its agent;

“Preliminary approval” means the action taken by the authority preliminarily approving an eligible project for incentives under this subchapter;

“Project” means any property, asset, or improvement located in a development area and certified by the governing body as:

Being for a public purpose; and

Being for the development of facilities for residential, commercial, industrial, public, recreational, or other uses, or for open space, including the development, rehabilitation, renovation, installation, improvement, enlargement, or extension of real estate and buildings; and

Contributing to economic development or tourism; and

Meeting the additional requirements established by KRS 154.30-040, 154.30-050, or 154.30-060;

“Signature project” means a project approved under KRS 154.30-050;

“State real property ad valorem tax” means real property ad valorem taxes levied under KRS 132.020(1)(a);

“State tax revenues” means revenues received by the Commonwealth from one (1) or more of the following sources:

State real property ad valorem taxes;

Individual income taxes levied under KRS 141.020, other than individual income taxes that have already been pledged to support an economic development project within the development area;

Corporation income taxes levied under KRS 141.040, other than corporation income taxes that have already been pledged to support an economic development project within the development area;

Limited liability entity taxes levied under KRS 141.0401, other than limited liability entity taxes that have already been pledged to support an economic development project within the development area; and

Sales taxes levied under KRS 139.200, excluding sales taxes already pledged for:

Approved tourism attraction projects, as defined in KRS 148.851, within the development area; and

Projects which are approved for sales tax refunds under Subchapter 20 of KRS Chapter 154 within the development area;

“Tax incentive agreement” means an agreement entered into in accordance with KRS 154.30-070; and

“Termination date” means:

For a tax incentive agreement satisfying the requirements of KRS 154.30-040 or 154.30-060, a date established by the tax incentive agreement that is no more than twenty (20) years from the activation date. However, the termination date for a tax incentive agreement shall in no event be more than forty (40) years from the establishment date of the development area to which the tax incentive agreement relates; and

For a project grant agreement satisfying the requirements of KRS 154.30-050, a date established by the tax incentive agreement that is no more than thirty (30) years from the activation date. However, the termination date for a tax incentive agreement shall in no event be more than forty (40) years from the establishment date of the development area to which the tax incentive agreement relates.

For all projects established after July 14, 2018, the activation date is the date on which the time period for the pledge of incremental revenues shall commence. To implement the activation date, the minimum capital investment must be met and the agency that is a party to the tax incentive agreement shall notify the office;

that have been determined by the commission to represent a unique challenge in the financing of a project such that the project could not be developed without incentives intended by this chapter to foster economic development;

The method for increasing old revenues shall be set forth in the tax incentive agreement;

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 178, § 14, effective July 15, 2008; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 102, effective June 26, 2009; 2011, ch. 62, § 7, effective June 8, 2011; 2018 ch. 199, § 26, effective July 14, 2018.

154.30-020.
Findings of General Assembly relative to development areas and projects.

The General Assembly finds that the establishment of development areas and projects which result in increased property values, increased employment opportunities, and increased economic activity in communities within the Commonwealth serves a public purpose.

The General Assembly further finds and declares that the authority prescribed in this subchapter, and the purposes to be accomplished thereunder are proper.

History.
Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 178, § 15, effective July 15, 2008.

154.30-030.
State tax increment financing participation programs — Application requirements for a local government to request state participation — Authority review requirements — Pledge limitations — Tax incentive agreements required — Independent consultant’s report.

The Commonwealth shall offer three (3) tax increment financing participation programs. The first program, the criteria and details of which are set forth in KRS 154.30-040, relates to a pledge of state real property ad valorem taxes only. The second program, the criteria and details of which are set forth in KRS 154.30-050, is the Signature Projects Program. The third program, the criteria and details of which are set forth in KRS 154.30-060, relates to the pledge of state tax revenues to support mixed-use development in blighted urban areas.

A city or county that has established a development area pursuant to KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and 65.7053, or an agency designated as the entity managing a development area established pursuant to KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and 65.7053, may submit an application to the authority requesting that the Commonwealth participate in a project.
(2) (a)

A city or county that has established a development area pursuant to KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and 65.7053, or an agency designated as the entity managing a development area established pursuant to KRS 65.7049, 65.7051, and 65.7053, may submit an application to the authority requesting that the Commonwealth participate in a project.

The application shall identify the specific program under which state participation is being requested and shall include the following attachments, in addition to any requirements developed by the authority pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection:

A copy of the ordinance adopted by the city or county establishing the development area;

A copy of the local participation agreement; and

Data and information supporting the determinations and findings required by KRS 65.7049.

The staff of the authority shall review the application to determine if the applicant has met all of the statutory and regulatory requirements established by this subchapter and shall notify the applicant in writing of its determination. This review shall be preliminary in nature and shall not constitute approval of the request. All applications for participation by the Commonwealth shall be reviewed by the authority for approval.

Applications meeting all statutory and regulatory requirements requesting participation by the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS 154.30-040, along with any supporting materials, shall be referred by the staff of the authority to the authority for consideration.
3. a.

Applications meeting all statutory and regulatory requirements requesting participation by the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS 154.30-040, along with any supporting materials, shall be referred by the staff of the authority to the authority for consideration.

Applicants meeting all statutory and regulatory requirements requesting participation by the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS 154.30-050(2)(b) or 154.30-060 shall be required to submit a report prepared by an independent consultant or financial adviser as described in subsection (6) of this section for the application to be complete. The staff of the authority shall notify such applicants of the report requirements and shall provide information regarding the contents and requirements for the report at the same time it notifies the applicant of the results of its preliminary review.
b. i.

Applicants meeting all statutory and regulatory requirements requesting participation by the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS 154.30-050(2)(b) or 154.30-060 shall be required to submit a report prepared by an independent consultant or financial adviser as described in subsection (6) of this section for the application to be complete. The staff of the authority shall notify such applicants of the report requirements and shall provide information regarding the contents and requirements for the report at the same time it notifies the applicant of the results of its preliminary review.

Upon receipt and review of the report, the staff of the authority shall refer the application and supporting information to the authority for consideration.

Additional standards and requirements for the application process shall be established by the authority through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The authority may request any materials and make any inquiries concerning an application that the authority deems necessary.
(3) (a)

The authority may request any materials and make any inquiries concerning an application that the authority deems necessary.

The authority shall, through the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish commercially reasonable limitations on the financing costs that may be recovered under the provisions of KRS 154.30-050.

Upon review of an application and other information available, the authority may pledge all or a portion of the state real property ad valorem tax incremental revenue of the Commonwealth or state tax revenues attributable to the footprint of the project, as limited by KRS 154.30-040, 154.30-050, or 154.30-060, whichever is applicable.

If incremental revenues are pledged from less than one hundred percent (100%) of the footprint of the project, a description of the included portion of the development area shall be provided.

State tax revenues from the development area that have not been pledged to projects within the development area may be used to support other economic development projects or tourism projects approved under KRS 139.536 and 148.851 to 148.860, provided that state tax revenues shall not be pledged more than once during the existence of the development area. Thus, state tax revenues pledged to support increment bonds issued for the development area, or a project in the development area shall not be pledged to support any other development area, project, program, development, or undertaking during the life of the development area. If less than one hundred percent (100%) of incremental revenues are pledged pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter, the remaining incremental revenues shall not be used to support other economic development projects or tourism projects approved under KRS 139.536 and 148.851 to 148.860.

The pledge of incremental state real property ad valorem tax revenues or state tax revenues of the Commonwealth by the authority shall be implemented through the execution of a tax incentive agreement between the Commonwealth and the agency, city, or county, as the case may be, in accordance with KRS 154.30-070.

The authority shall engage the services of a qualified independent outside consultant or financial adviser to analyze the data related to the project and the development area and prepare the report required by subsection (2) of this section. The report shall include the following:
(6) (a)

The authority shall engage the services of a qualified independent outside consultant or financial adviser to analyze the data related to the project and the development area and prepare the report required by subsection (2) of this section. The report shall include the following:

The estimated approved public infrastructure costs for the project and, if relevant, approved signature project costs, financing costs, and costs associated with land preparation, demolition, and clearance;

The feasibility of the project, taking into account the scope and location of the project;

The estimated amount of local tax revenues and state tax revenues, as applicable, that would be generated by the project over the period, which may be up to twenty (20) years or thirty (30) years, as applicable, from the activation date;

The estimated amount of local tax revenues and state tax revenues, as applicable, that would be displaced within the Commonwealth, for the purpose of quantifying economic activity which is being shifted over the same period as that set forth in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph. The projections for displaced activity shall include economic activity that is lost to the Commonwealth as a result of the project, as well as economic activity that is diverted to the project that formerly took place at existing establishments within the Commonwealth prior to the commencement date of the project;

The estimated amount of local and state old revenues that would have been generated in the footprint of the project in the absence of the project, computed over the same time period as set forth in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph;

In the process of estimating the revenues and impacts prescribed in subparagraphs 3. and 4. of this paragraph, the independent outside consultant shall not consider any of the following:

Revenues or economic impacts associated with any projects within the development area where the new project will be located; and

Revenues or economic impacts associated with economic development projects and approved Kentucky Tourism Development Act projects under KRS Chapter 148;

The relationship of the estimated incremental revenues to the financing needs, including any increment bonds, of the project;

When estimating the fiscal impact of the project, the consultant shall evaluate the amount of revenue estimated in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph and shall deduct the amounts estimated in subparagraphs 4. and 5. of this paragraph. The resulting difference shall be compared to the estimated incremental revenues to determine the presence or absence of a positive fiscal impact; and

A determination that the project will not occur if not for the designation of the development area, the granting of incremental revenues by the taxing district or districts, other than the Commonwealth, and the granting of the state tax incremental revenues.

The independent consultant or financial advisor shall consult with the Office of State Budget Director, and the Finance and Administration Cabinet in the development of the report.
(b) 1.

The independent consultant or financial advisor shall consult with the Office of State Budget Director, and the Finance and Administration Cabinet in the development of the report.

The Office of State Budget Director and the staff of the authority, in collaboration with the independent consultant or financial advisor, shall agree on a methodology to be used and assumptions to be made by the independent consultant or financial consultant in preparing its report.

On the basis of the independent consultant’s report and the other materials provided, prior to any approval of a project by the authority, the Office of State Budget Director and the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall certify to the authority whether there is a projected net positive economic impact to the Commonwealth and the expected amount of state tax incremental revenues from the project.

The city, county, or agency making the application shall pay all costs associated with the independent consultant’s or financial advisor’s report.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2008, ch. 178, § 16, effective July 15, 2008.

154.30-040.
Commonwealth Participation Program for State Real Property Ad Valorem Tax Revenues — Criteria for state participation — Qualifying expenditures — Pledge limitations — Authority review — Required determinations by the authority — Tax incentive agreement required.

The Commonwealth Participation Program for State Real Property Ad Valorem Tax Revenues is hereby established.

State participation under this program shall be limited to the support of approved public infrastructure costs determined to be necessary to support private investment or private development projects that benefit the public, where project economics are unable to support or secure necessary financing to undertake the public improvements.

A project shall meet all of the following criteria to be considered for state participation under this program:

The project shall represent new economic activity in the Commonwealth;

The project shall result in a minimum capital investment of ten million dollars ($10,000,000); and

Not more than twenty percent (20%) of the capital investment or twenty percent (20%) of the finished square footage shall be devoted to the support or development of assets that will be utilized for the retail sale of tangible personal property.

The authority shall review the application and supporting information as provided in KRS 154.30-030.

The authority may pledge up to one hundred percent (100%) of the Commonwealth’s state real property ad valorem tax incremental revenue from the footprint of a project, provided that the maximum amount of incremental revenues that may be pledged during the term of the state participation agreement for a project shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of approved public infrastructure costs.

As part of the approval process, the authority shall determine the following:

The footprint of the project;

The maximum amount of approved public infrastructure costs;

That the local revenues pledged to support the public infrastructure of the project, and local revenues pledged to support the overall project are of a sufficient amount to warrant participation of the Commonwealth in the project;

The termination date of the project grant agreement, not to exceed twenty (20) years from the activation date; and

Any adjustments to be made to old revenues in determining incremental revenues during each year of the term of the project grant agreement.

The pledge of incremental state real property ad valorem tax revenues of the Commonwealth by the authority shall be implemented through the execution of a tax incentive agreement between the Commonwealth and the agency, city, or county, in accordance with KRS 154.30-070.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2008, ch. 178, § 17, effective July 15, 2008.

154.30-050.
Signature Project Program — Purpose — Two initiatives — Criteria for state participation — Qualifying expenditures — Authority review — Required determinations by the authority — Pledge limitations — Tax incentive agreement required — Authority may approve reduction in required minimum capital investment.

The Signature Project Program is hereby established. The purpose of this program is to encourage private investment in the development of major projects that will have a significant impact on the Commonwealth of Kentucky and are judged to be of such a magnitude that the effect upon the location of such project warrants extraordinary public support.

There shall be two (2) separate initiatives under this program. The first initiative, the criteria and details of which are set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall apply to qualifying projects that are not the subject of a contract under KRS 65.495 in effect on or before the March 23, 2007, but that have a project grant agreement executed pursuant to KRS 154.30-070 prior to January 1, 2008. The second initiative, the criteria and details of which are set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall apply to projects that meet the specified requirements on or after January 1, 2008.

For projects that are not the subject of a contract under KRS 65.495 in effect on or before March 23, 2007, but that have a project grant agreement executed pursuant to the provisions of KRS 154.30-070 prior to January 1, 2008:

The criteria for qualification shall be as follows:

The project shall represent new economic activity in the Commonwealth; and

The project shall result in a minimum capital investment of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000).

The following provisions shall apply to projects that meet the criteria established in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph:

KRS 65.7051 shall not apply to the establishment of a development area;

The city or county in which the project is located shall adopt an ordinance establishing the development area. The ordinance shall be adopted in accordance with KRS 65.7053(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and (m);

KRS 65.7049, 65.7053(2) and (3), 65.7057, 65.7059, 65.7061, 65.7063, 65.7065, and 65.7067, relating to local development areas, shall apply;

An application for state participation shall have been submitted as provided in KRS 154.30-030. The application shall include the information required by KRS 154.30-030(2)(a) 1.a. and b.;

The report provided for in KRS 154.30-030(2)(a) 3.b. shall not be required, and the certification required by KRS 154.30-030(6)(b) shall not be required;

A project grant agreement shall be executed in accordance with KRS 154.30-070; and

KRS 154.30-080 and 154.30-090 shall apply.

Projects that meet the criteria established in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be eligible for the following:

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of approved public infrastructure costs, excluding any sales and use tax paid, may be recovered;

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of the financing costs associated with approved public infrastructure costs may be recovered;

In a county containing a city of the first class, the local participation agreement may provide for the release of up to eighty percent (80%) of the increment from the tax levied under KRS 91A.390 derived by the governing body within the project development area. The amount released shall not exceed a base amount of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in the first year of the local participation agreement, which base amount shall be increased in each subsequent year of the grant agreement by four percent (4%); and

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of approved signature project costs, excluding any sales and use taxes paid, subject to the following:

The authority shall review proposed expenditures for inclusion in the tax incentive agreement. The authority may approve the type of expenditures it determines are necessary for completion of the private development; and

Approved signature project costs shall be detailed in the tax incentive agreement.

Beginning January 1, 2008:

A project shall meet all of the following criteria to be considered for state participation under this program:

The project shall represent new economic activity in the Commonwealth;

The project shall result in a minimum capital investment of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000);

The project shall result in a net positive economic impact to the Commonwealth, taking into consideration any substantial adverse impact on existing Commonwealth businesses. The net positive impact shall be certified to the commission as required by KRS 154.30-030(6)(b); and

Not more than twenty percent (20%) of the capital investment or twenty percent (20%) of the finished square footage shall be devoted to the support or development of assets that will be utilized for the retail sale of tangible personal property.

Projects that meet the criteria established by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall comply with all relevant provisions of this subchapter.

Projects that meet the criteria established by subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph shall be eligible to recover:

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of approved public infrastructure costs, excluding any sales and use taxes paid;

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of the financing costs associated with approved public infrastructure costs; and

Up to one hundred percent (100%) of approved signature project costs, excluding sales and use taxes paid subject to the following:

The authority shall review proposed expenditures for inclusion in the tax incentive agreement. The authority may approve the type of expenditures it determines are necessary for completion of the private development; and

Approved signature project costs shall be detailed in the tax incentive agreement.

The authority shall review the application, the certification required by KRS 154.30-030, if applicable, and supporting information as provided in KRS 154.30-030.

The authority shall specifically identify the state taxes from which incremental revenues will be pledged. The authority may pledge up to eighty percent (80%) of the incremental revenues from the identified state tax revenues from the footprint, provided that the maximum amount of incremental revenues that may be pledged for a project during the term of the tax incentive agreement from all approved state taxes shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of approved public infrastructure costs, approved signature project costs, and financing costs.

As part of the approval process, the authority shall determine the following:

The footprint of the project;

The maximum amount of approved public infrastructure costs, approved signature project costs, and financing costs;

That the local revenues pledged to support the public infrastructure of the project, and local revenues pledged to support the overall project are of a sufficient amount to warrant participation of the Commonwealth in the project;

The termination date of the tax incentive agreement, not to exceed thirty (30) years from the activation date;

Any adjustments to be made to old revenues, in determining incremental revenues during each year of the term of the project grant agreement; and

Any approved signature project costs;

For the purpose of making the determination required by KRS 139.515(2), the authority shall review the projected expenditures for tangible personal property used in the construction of a signature project, as defined in KRS 139.515(1), and shall establish an approximate percentage of the total anticipated expenditures that are not included in the tax incentive agreement as approved public infrastructure costs or approved signature project costs. This percentage shall be communicated by the authority to the Department of Revenue, which shall use the information in administering the sales tax refund permitted by KRS 139.515.

If state income taxes or local occupational license taxes are included for a project that includes office space, the authority shall consider the impact of pledging theses taxes on the ability to utilize other economic development projects at a later date.

The pledge of state incremental tax revenues of the Commonwealth by the authority shall be implemented through the execution of a tax incentive agreement between the Commonwealth and the agency, city, or county in accordance with KRS 154.30-070.

Notwithstanding the minimum capital investment of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) required by subsection (2)(b)1.b. of this section, the authority may, upon application of an agency that:

Was approved to proceed with a project after January 1, 2008, but before January 1, 2013, that, at the time of approval pledged to make the two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) investment requirement; and

Had a consultant report prepared pursuant to KRS 154.30-030(6);

approve a reduction in the required minimum capital investment to an amount not less than one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000), subject to a corresponding adjustment of the maximum incremental revenue available for recovery as appropriate, based upon the recommendation of the consultant who prepared the report pursuant to KRS 154.30-030(6).

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2008, ch. 178, § 18, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 36, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

154.30-052.
Signature project loan support program — Program requirements. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 64, effective June 26, 2009; repealed by 2018 ch. 199, § 37, effective July 14, 2018.